Utah statutes.
54-14-304.   Initial hearing.

(1)  The board shall convene an initial hearing within 40 days of the date review is initiated.

(2)  At the initial hearing, the board shall determine how the review will take place, including whether it will be conducted as a formal or informal adjudicative proceeding.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1997 General Session

